Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202681-2,162.22
Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act, how cited.

Sections 81-2,162.01 to 81-2,162.28 shall be known and may be cited as the Nebraska Commercial Fertilizer and Beneficial Substances Act.

Laws 1955, c. 334, § 22, p. 1046;

Laws 1975, LB 333, § 23;

Laws 1987, LB 201, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB263, § 4;

Laws 2026, LB948, § 29.
March 17, 2026